District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1103.03

Duties of Director.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 456, Pub. L. 93-376, title III, § 303
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(p)-(r), 29 DCR 458
April 5, 2000, D.C. Law 13-79, § 2(d), 46 DCR 10460
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-163, § 2(a), 47 DCR 5812
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1061, 57 DCR 181
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1433.
1973 Ed., § 1-1153.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of District of Columbia Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Act of 1974 Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-22, June 17, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 3236).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1061 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1061 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 1060 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle G of title I of the act may be cited as the “Campaign Finance Electronic Signature Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short Title